src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Rumanian morphological analyser                      
! ========================================================================== !


! ======================
!! !!!Sublexica for Verb
! ======================



! Sone 2c: Konjugasjonsklassane
! ============================


! Første konjugasjon
! ------------------

LEXICON v
Conj1a ;

LEXICON Conj1a
+V: Inf1 ;
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_a ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_am ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_ati ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_a ;

LEXICON Conj1b
+V: Inf1 ;
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs_u ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_a ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_am ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_ati ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_a ;

LEXICON Conj1c
+V: Inf1 ;
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs_i ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_e ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_em ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_ati ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_e ;

LEXICON Conj1d
+V: Inf1 ;
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs_ez ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_ezi ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_eaza ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_am ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_ati ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_eaza ;



! Andre konjugasjon
! -----------------

LEXICON Conj2a
+V: Inf2 ;		     !vedea
+V+Prs:%^EA Sg1Prs ;	 !văd
+V+Prs:    Sg2Prs_i ;	 !vezi
+V+Prs:    Sg3Prs_e ;	 !vede
+V+Prs:    Pl1Prs_em ;	 !vedem
+V+Prs:    Pl2Prs_eti ;  !vedeți
+V+Prs:%^EA Pl3Prs ;	 !văd
! define ea e -> ă || _ Cns* %^EA ;

LEXICON Conj2b
+V: Inf2 ;		         !tăcea
+V+Prs:%^AA Sg1Prs ;	     !tac
+V+Prs:%^AA Sg2Prs_i ;	     !taci
+V+Prs:%^AA Sg3Prs_e ;	     !tace
+V+Prs:     Pl1Prs_em ;	     !tăcem
+V+Prs:     Pl2Prs_eti ;     !tăceți
+V+Prs:%^AA Pl3Prs ;	     !tac
! define aa ă -> a || _ Cns* %^AA ;


! Tredje konjugasjon
! ------------------

LEXICON Conj3
+V: Inf3 ;
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_e ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_em ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_eti ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs ;


! Fjerde konjugasjon
! ------------------

LEXICON Conj4a
+V: Inf4 ;       !dormi
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs ;	  !dorm
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;	  !dormi
+V+Prs:%^OA Sg3Prs_e ;!doarme ! multichar symbol som gir o -> oa
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_im ;	  !dormim
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_iți ;  !dormiți
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs ;	  !dorm
! define oa o -> o a || _ Cns* %^OA ; (regel i xfst)

LEXICON Conj4b
+V: Inf4 ;       !dormi
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs_esc ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_ești ;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_ește ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_im ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_iți ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_esc ;

LEXICON Conj4c
+V: Inf4 ;       !dormi
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs ;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i ;
+V+Prs:%^OA Sg3Prs_a ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_im ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_iți ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_a ;

LEXICON Conj4d
+V: Inf4 ;       !dormi
+V+Prs: Sg1Prs_ăsc;
+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_ăsti;
+V+Prs: Sg3Prs_ăste ;
+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_im ;
+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_iți ;
+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_ăsc ;


! Femte konjugasjon
! -----------------

!LEXICON Conj5
!+V+Inf:%>a # ;
!+V+Prs: Sg1Prs;
!+V+Prs: Sg2Prs_i;
!+V+Prs: %^OA Sg3Prs_ă ;
!+V+Prs: Pl1Prs_im ;
!+V+Prs: Pl2Prs_iți ;
!+V+Prs: Pl3Prs_ă ;



! Uregelrette
! -----------

LEXICON Fi
+Inf:fi # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:sunt # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ești # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:este # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:suntem # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:sunteți # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:sunt # ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:eram # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:erai # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:era # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:eram # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:erați # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:erau # ;

+Ind+Plu+Sg1:fusesem # ;
+Ind+Plu+Sg2:fuseseși # ;
+Ind+Plu+Sg3:fusese # ;
+Ind+Plu+Pl1:fusesem # ;
+Ind+Plu+Pl2:fuseseți # ;
+Ind+Plu+Pl3:fuseseră # ;

+Sbj+Prs+Sg1:fiu # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Sg2:fii # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Sg3:fie # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Pl1:fim # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Pl2:fiți # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Pl3:fie # ;

+Ptc+Msc+Sg:fost # ;
+Ptc+Fem+Sg:fostă # ;
+Ptc+Neu+Sg:fost # ;
+Ptc+Msc+Pl:fosti # ;
+Ptc+Fem+Pl:foste # ;
+Ptc+Neu+Pl:foste # ;


LEXICON Avea
 InfAvea ;       !avea
+Prs: Sg1Prs_m;
+Prs: Sg2Prs_i;
+Prs: Sg3Prs_re ;
+Prs: Pl1Prs_vem ;
+Prs: Pl2Prs_veți ;
+Prs: Pl3Prs_u ;



! Sone 3: Bøying
! ==============

! Infinitte former
! ----------------

LEXICON Inf1
+Inf:%>a # ;

LEXICON Inf2
+Inf:%>ea # ;

LEXICON Inf3
+Inf:%>e # ;

LEXICON Inf4
+Inf:%>i # ; 

LEXICON InfAvea
+Inf:%>vea # ; 

! Presensformer
! -------------

LEXICON Sg1Prs
+Sg1: # ;

LEXICON Sg2Prs_i
+Sg2:%>i # ;


LEXICON Sg3Prs_a
+Sg3:%>ă # ;

LEXICON Pl1Prs_am
+Pl1:%>ăm # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_ati
+Pl2:%>ați # ;


LEXICON Pl3Prs_ă
+Pl3:%>ă # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_u
+Sg1:%>u # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_i
+Sg1:%>i # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_e
+Sg3:%>e # ;

LEXICON Pl1Prs_em
+Pl1:%>em # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_e
+Pl3:%>e # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_ez
+Sg1:%>ez # ;

LEXICON Sg2Prs_ezi
+Sg2:%>ezi # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_eaza
+Sg3:%>eăză # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_eaza
+Pl3:%>ează # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_eți
+Pl3:%>eți # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs
+Pl3: # ;

LEXICON Pl1Prs_im
+Pl1:%im # ;	

LEXICON Pl1Prs_Im
+Pl1:%îm # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_iți
+Pl2:%iți # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_esc
+Sg1:%>esc # ;

LEXICON Sg2Prs_ești
+Sg2:%>ești # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_ește
+Sg3:%>ește # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_esc
+Pl3:%>esc # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_a
+Pl3:%>a # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_ăsc
+Prs:%>ăsc # ;

LEXICON Sg2Prs_ăsti
+Prs:%>ăsti # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_ăste
+Prs:%>ăste # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_ăsc
+Prs:%>ăsc # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_eti
+Pl2:%>eti # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_u
+Pl3:%>u # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_veți
+Pl2:%>veți # ;

LEXICON Pl1Prs_vem
+Pl1:%>vem # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_re
+Sg3:%>re # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_m
+Sg1:%> # ;

LEXICON Pl3Prs_t
+Pl3:%>t # ;

LEXICON Pl2Prs_teți
+Pl2:%>teti # ;

LEXICON Pl1Prs_tem
+Pl1:%>tem # ;

LEXICON Sg1Prs_t
+Sg1:%>t # ;

LEXICON Sg3Prs_te
+Sg3:%>te # ;

LEXICON Sg2Prs_ti
+Sg2:%>ti # ;

!LEXICON Pl2Prs_eți
!+Pl2:%>eți # ;

!LEXICON Pl1Prs_Im	
!+Pl1:%>îm # ;
