src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avea:a Avea ; ! have
fi+V:    Fi ; !  be
intra:intr       Conj1b ;
întîrzia:întîrzi Conj1c ;
fluiera:fluier   Conj1d ;
vedea:ved        Conj2a ;
tăcea:tăc        Conj2b ;
merge:merg       Conj3 ;
vorbi:vorb       Conj4b ;
coborî:cobor     Conj4c ;
hotărî:hotar     Conj4d ;
zidi:zid         Conj4b ;
deranja:deranj Conj1d "to disturb" ;  !
decapita:decapit Conj1d "to behead" ;  !
pleda:pled Conj1d "to plead" ;  !
adăuga:adăug Conj1a "to add" ;  !
suda:sud Conj1d "to weld" ;  !
ateriza:ateriz Conj1d "to land" ;  !
lega:leg Conj1a "to bind" ;  !
recompensa:recompens Conj1d "to reward" ;  !
îmbrățișa:îmbrățiș Conj1d "to embrace" ;  !
dansa:dans Conj1d "to dance" ;  !
înainta:înaint Conj1d "to advance" ;  !
influența:influenț Conj1d "to influence" ;  !
pronunța:pronunț Conj1a "to pronounce" ;  !
forța:forț Conj1d "to force" ;  !
degrada:degrad Conj1d "to degrade" ;  !
încredința:încredinț Conj1d "to confide" ;  !
admonesta:admonest Conj1d "to chide" ;  !
aproviziona:aprovizion Conj1d "to provide" ;  !
exploda:explod Conj1d "to explode" ;  !
libera:liber Conj1d "to free" ;  !
încuraja:încuraj Conj1d "to encourage" ;  !
asedia:asedi Conj1d "to besiege" ;  !
schimba:schimb Conj1a "to change" ;  !
aranja:aranj Conj1d "to arrange" ;  !
frâna:frân Conj1d "to brake" ;  !
lua:lu Conj1a "to take" ;  ! XXX
amesteca:amestec Conj1a "to mingle" ;  !
linia:lini Conj1a "to line" ;  !
cruța:cruț Conj1a "to spare" ;  !
restaura:restaur Conj1a "to restore" ;  !
elibera:eliber Conj1a "to release" ;  !
mira:mir Conj1a "to surprise" ;  !
dedica:dedic Conj1a "to dedicate" ;  !
regla:regl Conj1a "to regulate" ;  !
dicta:dict Conj1a "to dictate" ;  !
gusta:gust Conj1a "to taste" ;  !
decepționa:decepțion Conj1a "to deceive" ;  !
muta:mut Conj1a "to move" ;  !
datora:dator Conj1a "to owe" ;  !
atârna:atârn Conj1a "to hang" ;  !
demola:demol Conj1a "to demolish" ;  !
selecta:select Conj1a "to pick" ;  !
observa:observ Conj1a "to remark" ;  !
egala:egal Conj1a "to equal" ;  !
visa:vis Conj1a "to dream" ;  !
curăța:curăț Conj1a "to clean" ;  !
aplatiza:aplatiz Conj1a "to flatten" ;  !
câștiga:câștig Conj1a "to win" ;  !
poseda:posed Conj1a "to own" ;  !
șchiopăta:șchiopăt Conj1a "to limp" ;  !
împiedica:împiedic Conj1a "to hinder" ;  !
intra:intr Conj1a "to enter" ;  !
înconjura:înconjur Conj1a "to encompass" ;  !
desposeda:desposed Conj1a "to dispossess" ;  !
repeta:repet Conj1a "to repeat" ;  !
trata:trat Conj1d "to treat" ;  !
maltrata:maltrat Conj1d "to mistreat" ;  !
întretăia:întretăi Conj1a "to intersect" ;  !
tulbura:tulbur Conj1a "to upset" ;  !
picta:pict Conj1a "to paint" ;  !
sugera:suger Conj1a "to suggest" ;  !
sufla:sufl Conj1a "to blow" ;  !
asculta:ascult Conj1a "to obey" ;  !
purta:purt Conj1a "to carry" ;  !
întrece:întrec Conj3 "to exceed" ;  !
interzice:interzic Conj3 "to forbid" ;  !
cere:cer Conj3 "to demand" ;  !
depinde:depind Conj3 "to depend" ;  !
transcrie:transcri Conj3 "to transcribe" ;  !
convinge:conving Conj3 "to convince" ;  !
produce:produc Conj3 "to produce" ;  !
convinge:conving Conj3 "to persuade" ;  !
ascunde:ascund Conj3 "to hide" ;  !
conduce:conduc Conj3 "to guide" ;  !
întreprinde:întreprind Conj3 "to undertake" ;  !
aprinde:aprind Conj3 "to inflame" ;  !
descrește:descreșt Conj3 "to decrease" ;  !
șterge:șterg Conj3 "to erase" ;  !
surprinde:surprind Conj3 "to surprise" ;  !
închide:închid Conj3 "to close" ;  !
alege:aleg Conj3 "to choose" ;  !
presupune:presupun Conj3 "to suppose" ;  !
traduce:traduc Conj3 "to translate" ;  !
crede:cred Conj3 "to believe" ;  !
percepe:percep Conj3 "to perceive" ;  !
trage:trag Conj3 "to drag" ;  !
prinde:prind Conj3 "to catch" ;  !
stinge:sting Conj3 "to extinguish" ;  !
smulge:smulg Conj3 "to pluck" ;  !
constrânge:constrâng Conj3 "to compel" ;  !
ucide:ucid Conj3 "to kill" ;  !
geme:gem Conj3 "to moan" ;  !
deține:dețin Conj3 "to detain" ;  !
face:fac Conj3 "to do" ;  !
rupe:rup Conj3 "to tear" ;  !
trece:trec Conj3 "to pass" ;  !
alege:aleg Conj3 "to elect" ;  !
conduce:conduc Conj3 "to conduct" ;  !
expune:expun Conj3 "to exhibit" ;  !
transmite:transmit Conj3 "to transmit" ;  !
închide:închid Conj3 "to shut" ;  !
curge:curg Conj3 "to flow" ;  !
zice:zic Conj3 "to say" ;  !
construi:constru Conj4a "to build" ;  !
privi:priv Conj4a "to behold" ;  !
cheltui:cheltu Conj4a "to spend" ;  !
răni:răn Conj4a "to wound" ;  !
păli:păl Conj4a "to fade" ;  !
îmbătrâni:îmbătrân Conj4a "to age" ;  !
lovi:lov Conj4a "to strike" ;  !
bombăni:bombăn Conj4a "to grumble" ;  !
zâmbi:zâmb Conj4a "to smile" ;  !
deveni:deven Conj4a "to become" ;  !
împărți:împărț Conj4a "to share" ;  !
găuri:găur Conj4a "to bore" ;  !
îndrăzni:îndrăzn Conj4a "to venture" ;  !
disprețui:disprețu Conj4a "to despise" ;  !
împrejmui:împrejmu Conj4a "to enclose" ;  !
trezi:trez Conj4a "to rouse" ;  !
contribui:contribu Conj4a "to contribute" ;  !
lipi:lip Conj4a "to glue" ;  !
dobândi:dobând Conj4a "to achieve" ;  !
lipsi:lips Conj4a "to deprive" ;  !
dovedi:doved Conj4a "to prove" ;  !
înghesui:înghesu Conj4a "to stuff" ;  !
păzi:păz Conj4a "to watch" ;  !
bicui:bicu Conj4a "to lash" ;  !
pedepsi:pedeps Conj4a "to punish" ;  !
dori:dor Conj4a "to wish" ;  !
vorbi:vorb Conj4a "to talk" ;  !
privi:priv Conj4a "to look" ;  !
coji:coj Conj4a "to peel" ;  !
locui:locu Conj4a "to dwell" ;  !
înflori:înflor Conj4a "to blossom" ;  !
întări:întăr Conj4a "to stiffen" ;  !
slăbi:slăb Conj4a "to weaken" ;  !
îndulci:îndulc Conj4a "to sweeten" ;  !
deosebi:deoseb Conj4a "to discern" ;  !
hoinări:hoinăr Conj4a "to wander" ;  !
hărțui:hărțu Conj4a "to harass" ;  !
zămisli:zămisl Conj4a "to beget" ;  !
sui:su Conj4a "to mount" ;  !
ști:șt Conj4a "to know" ;  !
coborî v "to descend" ;  !
hotărî v "to decide" ;  !
urî v "to hate" ;  !
cădea_grindină v "to hail" ;  !
târî v "to creep" ;  !
omorî v "to murder" ;  !
bate_cu_ciocanul v "to hammer" ;  !
coborî v "to lower" ;  !
